src/twol-sms.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Skolt Sámi TWOLC file
!
! $Id$
!
!

Alphabet
  a b c d e f g h i ï j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å
  á é í
  Å Ä Ö Ø Æ Á
  Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð
  á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ª ß ç
  č ǩ ǯ ǧ ž đ ǥ ʒ š ŋ
  Č Ǩ Ǯ Ǧ Ž Đ Ǥ Ʒ Š Ŋ
  õ â
  Õ Â
 %':0 ! long consonant marker that does not appear in writing 
 ’ ! Syllable marker that appears in writing _võˊll’jed_
  %ˊ ! :0 
!  %,:%ˊ
  %^1VOW:0 %^2VOW:0 %^3VOW:0 %^4VOW:0 %^5VOW:0

%^VOWLower:0 ! i>e, õ>â, â>ä, u>o, o>å
%^VOWRaise:0 ! e>i, ä>e 
 %^VOWSH:0
 %^VOWL:0 ! Lengthens vowel in relation to consonant
 %^VOWXL:0 ! Extra lengthens vowel in relation to consonant
! in nouns, for example
 %^CXLong:0 %^CLong:0 %^CShort:0
%^VOWFront:0
%^PAL:0 %^PALNo:0
  X3:0 ! causes weak grade
 QÂ1:0 ! used with "mainsted" 'to tell (a story)'
 QA1:0 ! used with "vuejted" 'to drive (causative)'
 QE1:0 ! used with "kåˊmrded" 'to bow'
 %^IMPSG2:0
 %^INDPRSSG3:0



! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries below):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <

! Morpheme boundaries:
 «  ! Derivational prefix
 »  ! Derivational suffix
 %< ! Inflectional prefx
 %>:0 ! Inflectional suffix
 #  ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds
 %^ ! (exceptional) soft hyphenation point

! End of alphabet definitions
  ;

Sets
! Letter =
 C	= b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z đ ʒ ǯ č ŋ ǩ ǧ ǥ š ž ;
 V	= a e i o u å ä â õ ;

 CNoJV        = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z đ ʒ ǯ č ŋ ǩ ǧ ǥ š ž ;

Definitions

LongC = [ k: k: | s: s: | š: š: | c: c: | č: č: | m m: | v v: | đ đ: | n n: | l l: | r r: ] ;
!;

Rules

!"ˊ:0 rule"
! %ˊ:0 <=> V: _ C:+ (X3:) [ %^VOWSH: | %^1VOW: | %^2VOW: ] ;

!! "Even syllabic verbs I, ˊ:0 blocking"
!! %ˊ:0 /<= V: _ C:+ (X3:) [ %^3VOW: | %^4VOW: | %^5VOW: ] ;

! used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel shortening"
 Vx:0 <=> Vx: _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) LongC %^VOWSH: %^CLong: (%^VOWLower: |%^VOWRaise: ) (%^VOWFront: ) (X3:) (%^PAL: |%^PALNo: ) [ %>:0 | #:0 ]  ;
!! 2012-06-01 Vx: _ (%ˊ) C:+ (X3:) [ %^VOWSH: | %^2VOW: | %^3VOW: | %^4VOW: ] ;
 		where Vx in (â e å õ u i o a ä) ;
!! 		      Vy in (â e å õ u i o a)
!! 		matched ;

!! VOWEL SHIFT,

!! RAISING
! used for deriving +Ind+Prt+Sg1, +Ind+Prt+Sg2 +Ind+Prt+Pl3 in teevvad
"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel raising"
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Vx:  (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ]  (%^VOWSH: %^CLong: ) %^VOWRaise: %>:0 [ e | u ]  ; ! Adding +Prt+Pl3 for ed verbs
           _ Vx:0 (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ]  (%^VOWSH: %^CLong: ) %^VOWRaise: (%^PAL: ) %>:0 [ e | u ] ;
           _ 0:Vy (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ]  (%^VOWL: %^CShort: ) %^VOWRaise: %^PAL: %>:0 [ e | u ] ;
          [ C | #: ] _ ( u: ) (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ]  (%^VOWSH: %^CLong: | %^VOWL: ) %^VOWRaise: (%^PAL: ) %>:0 [ e | u ]  ;
! Removing ( u: | i: ) second element due to njeiddad njeiddu
              where Vx in (â o e å ä)
                    Vy in (õ u i o a)
              matched ;


! used for deriving +Ind+Prt+Pl3 in kuâs'sad > kuõs'su
! kuärŋŋad kuårŋŋu
"Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong raising beginning with u"
 Vx:Vy <=> u  _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ( %^VOWSH: %^CLong: ) %^VOWRaise: %>:0 u ;
          where Vx in (â ä)
                Vy in (õ å)
          matched ;

! used for deriving +Ind+Prt+Pl3 in reäkkad > riâkku
! veârrad > viõrru
"Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong raising beginning with e:i"
 Vx:Vy <=> e:  _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ]  (%^VOWSH: %^CLong: ) %^VOWRaise: %>:0 u ;
          where Vx in (â ä)
                Vy in (õ â)
          matched ;

! used for deriving +Ind+Prt+Pl3 in reäkkad > riâkku
! veârrad > viõrru
"Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong raising with e:i at onset"
 e:i <=>  _ [ â:õ | ä:â ] (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ]  (%^VOWSH: %^CLong: ) %^VOWRaise: %>:0 u ;



!! LOWERING 
! Where: VIGGAD +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Ind+Prs+Pl3
!        TIETTED 
! long and single vowels

! used for deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Ind+Prs+Pl3 in viǯǯâd
"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel lowering"
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Vx: (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ( %^VOWSH: %^CLong: | %^VOWL: %^CShort: )  %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:) (X3:) (%^PALNo: | %^PAL:) [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;
           Vx: _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ( %^VOWL: %^CShort: )  %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:) (X3:) (%^PALNo: | %^PAL:) [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;
           [#: | C: ] _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ( %^VOWSH: %^CLong: )  %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:) (X3:) (%^PALNo: | %^PAL:) [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;
           [#: | C: ] _ 0:Vy (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ( %^VOWL: %^CShort: )  %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:) (X3:) (%^PALNo: | %^PAL:) [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;
! juˊrdded > joordam
          [ #: | C ] _ ( u: | i: ) (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ( %^VOWL: %^CShort: ) %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront: ) (X3:) (%^PALNo: | %^PAL:) [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;
          [ #: | C ] _ ((%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) ( v:u | j:i )) (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ( %^VOWSH: %^CLong: ) %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront: ) (X3:) (%^PALNo: | %^PAL:) [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;
              where Vx in (õ u i o a)
                    Vy in (â o e å ä)
              matched ;
! diphthongs

! used for deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, in kuõskkâd kueˊsǩǩe
"Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening after u"
 Vx:Vy <=> u _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ( %^VOWL: %^CShort: )  %^VOWLower: (X3:) (%^PALNo: | %^PAL:) [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;
             where Vx in (õ å)
                   Vy in (â ä)
             matched ;

! used for deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, in čiõkkâd
"Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening after i:e"
 Vx:Vy <=> i: _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ( %^VOWL: %^CShort: )  %^VOWLower: (X3:) (%^PALNo: | %^PAL:) [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;
             where Vx in (õ â õ e)
                   Vy in (â ä ä ä)
             matched ;

! used in conjunction with diphthong opening
"Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening i:e before õ:, å:"
 i:e <=> _ [õ:â | õ:ä | â:ä | e:ä ] (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ( %^VOWL: %^CShort: )  %^VOWLower: (X3:) (%^PALNo: | %^PAL:) [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;



!! SECONDARY FRONTING

! used for deriving +Ind+Prs+Pl3 in VIQQAD: kuõskkâd >kueˊsǩǩe
! 
"Even syllabic verbs I, secondary vowel fronting with PAL u õ:e"
 õ:e <=> u _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ]  (%^VOWSH: %^CLong: | %^VOWL: %^CShort: ) (%^VOWLower: ) %^VOWFront: (X3:) %^PAL: [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ; ! deriving +V+Inf in vueˊlǧǧed
! used for deriving +V+Inf in TIETTED: _tiõtt_ > tieˊtted
         i _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] %^VOWFront: %^PAL: %>:0 ;
 

! used for deriving +Ind+Prs+Pl3 in VIQQAD: čiõkkâd >čeäˊǩ'ǩe
"Even syllabic verbs I, secondary vowel fronting with PAL"
 õ:ä <=> i:e _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ]  %^VOWSH: %^CLong: %^VOWLower: %^VOWFront: (X3:) %^PAL: [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;

!! ! used for deriving +V+Inf in TIETTED: _uudd_ >uˊvdded
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, secondary u > v PAL"
!! u:v <=> u _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] %^VOWFront: %^PAL: %>:0 ;

!! RELATIVE VOWEL LENGTHENING
! vowel lengthening and consonant shortening, %^VOWL and %^CShort 
! used for deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Imp+Sg2
"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening"
 0:Vx <=> C: Vx: _ [( u: | i: ) (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ] %^VOWL: %^CShort: ;
      C: Vx: _ ( u: | i: ) (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ)  C: [ QÂ1: ] C:+   %^VOWL:  ;
             where Vx in (â e å õ o a ä) ; 
! 2012-06-05 removing "i" and "u" because viikkâd renders viiiǥǥam

! used for declension of nouns võrr > võõr
"Even syllabic nouns, relative vowel extra lengthening"
 0:Vx <=> [ C: | #: ] Vx: _ [ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ] %^VOWXL: ;
             where Vx in (â e å õ o a ä) ;

! used for declension of nouns kunn > kuun
"Even syllabic nouns, relative vowel extra lengthening u not followed by v"
 0:u <=> [ C: | #: ] u: _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) [[ s: s: | n n: ] %^VOWXL: | CNoJV C:+ %^VOWL: %^CShort: ] ;
         


! used for conjugation of ceˊpcced > ciiˊpcež
! simultaneous lengthening and raising !!!hmm: xfst ordering might be easier
"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening and raising"
 0:Vy <=> [ C: | #: ] Vx:Vy _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) C:+ %^VOWL: %^CShort: %^VOWRaise: %^PAL: %>: e ;
             where Vx in (e â å ä o)
                   Vy in (i õ o a u)
             matched ;


! juˊrdded > joordam juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1
! simultaneous lengthening and lowering
"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening and lowering"
 0:Vy <=> [ C: | #: ] Vx:Vy _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) C:+ %^VOWL: %^CShort: %^VOWLower:  ;
             where Vx in (i õ o a u)
                   Vy in (e â å ä o)
             matched ;

! kååˊmmerd, maainâst
"Vowel lengthening in INDPRSSG3 and IMPSG2"
 0:Vx <=> Vx _ (i) ( %ˊ ) :C+ [ QE1: | QA1: | QÂ1: ] C:+ [ %^IMPSG2: | %^INDPRSSG3: ] ;
        where Vx in (a å ä) ;

!! VOWEL DUMMY LOSS

! QE1
"Vowel dummy loss when not INDPRSSG3 and IMPSG2"
 Vx:0 <=> _ C:+ %>: ;
       where Vx in (QE1) ;


!! SEMI VOWELS

! _sijdd > siid_ This will need a special extra-lengthening rule
"Even syllabic nouns, for j>i"
 j:i <=> [ C: | #: ] i: (0:%ˊ) _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) d d: [ %^VOWL: %^CShort: | %^VOWXL: | %^VOWLower: | %^VOWSH: %^CLong:  %^VOWLower: %^PAL: ];

! _uvdd > ouˊdde_ 
"Even syllabic verbs,  for v>u"
 v:u <=> [ C: | #: ] u: ( 0:u | 0:o ) (0:%ˊ) _ (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) d d: [ %^VOWL: %^CShort: | %^VOWXL: | %^VOWLower: | %^VOWSH: %^CLong:  %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront: ) %^PAL: ];

! i > j
"trisyllabic verbs and doer derivations, i>j"
 i:j <=> _ %> V ;


!! VOWEL and ZERO ALTERNATION

! _kåˊmrded_ _vuejat_  _maainâst_
"Realization for QE1 in e " !
 Vx:Vy <=> _ ( %ˊ ) C:+ %^IMPSG2: ;
         where Vx in (QE1 QA1 QÂ1)
               Vy in (e a â)
         matched ;

"Realization for QE1 in a"!
 Vx:Vy <=> _ ( %ˊ | ’: ) [ i | C:+ ] %^INDPRSSG3: ;
         where Vx in (QE1 QA1 QÂ1)
               Vy in (a a a)
         matched ;
         
!! THE NON-ORTHOGRAPHIC SYLLABLE 

! This is a temporary solution to  "’" in võˊll’jed
"Loss of _’_ when preceded by vowel"
 ’:0 <=> :V _  ; 


!! PALATALIZATION

! used +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
! The left context allows for:
! Vowel shortening, and j/v > V 
"Even-syllabic verbs I, Palatalization mark between V and C"
 0:%ˊ <=> [ V:0 | :V ] _ [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ( %^VOWSH: %^CLong: |%^VOWL: %^CShort: ) ( %^VOWLower: | %^VOWRaise: ) (%^VOWFront: ) (X3:) %^PAL: [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;

! 
"Even-syllabic verbs I, Palatalization of gg and kk"
 Cx:Cy <=> V: (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) (C:) _ Cx: ( %^VOWSH: %^CLong: ) ( %^VOWLower: | %^VOWRaise: ) (%^VOWFront: ) (X3:) %^PAL: [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;
            V: (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) (C:) Cx: _ ( %^VOWSH: %^CLong: ) ( %^VOWLower: | %^VOWRaise: ) (%^VOWFront: ) (X3:) %^PAL: [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;
                where Cx in (g k)
                      Cy in (ǧ ǩ)
                matched ;


!! ! removing palatalization Prs+Sg3
!!  "Even-syllabic verbs I, removing palatalization in -ed verbs"
!!   %ˊ:0 <=> V: _ [ C:+ | C:+ %': C:+ ] ( %^VOWSH: %^CLong: | %^VOWL: %^CShort: ) ( %^VOWLower: | %^VOWRaise: ) (%^VOWFront: ) (X3:) %^PALNo: [ %>:0 | #:0 ] ;
